Louisiana, session 2026, HB970.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 9:358 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§358. Competing custody order; procedure
A. Any judge who oversees child custody proceedings has a duty to ensure
there are no competing custody orders prior to issuing a custody order.
B. If a competing custody order is issued, the earliest order shall supercede
any subsequent competing custody order.